Utah statutes.
78B-2-102.   Time for commencement of actions generally.

Civil actions may be commenced only within the periods prescribed in this chapter, after the cause of action has accrued, except in specific cases where a different limitation is prescribed by statute.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

